Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
CHAPTER 9 Biologicals Permits

Cross references.

Regulation of manufacture and sale of drugs generally, T. 26, C. 3.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Use of biologicals on poultry and other animals, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-16-1.

4-9-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Georgia Biologicals Permit Act of 1966.”

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 334, § 1.

4-9-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Adulterant” means a substance used as an addition to another substance for falsification or adulteration.

“Adulteration” means an addition of an impure, cheap, or unnecessary ingredient to cheat, cheapen, or falsify a preparation.

“Biologicals” means medicinal preparations made from living organisms and their products, including serums, vaccines, antigens, and antitoxins which are for use on poultry and animals, excluding humans.

“Contaminant” means something that causes contamination, such as a foreign organism developing accidentally in a pure culture.

“Contamination” means the soiling or making inferior by contact or mixing.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 334, § 3.

4-9-3.
Permits — Application; issuance; exemptions; posting.

Every producer, manufacturer, distributor, or sales outlet selling, offering for sale, exposing for sale, distributing, or storing biologicals shall register with and obtain a permit from the department prior to engaging in such activities. No person, firm, or partnership shall engage in any such activities without a permit or while its permit is suspended or revoked. The registration and application for a permit shall be made on a form prescribed by the Commissioner. Upon compliance with this chapter, the applicant shall be issued a permit by the Commissioner for all biological products manufactured, distributed, or sold by the applicant. A previous violation of the law or any regulation of the department by the applicant shall constitute just cause for refusal of a permit.

This chapter shall not apply to any department of the federal or state government, any county board of health, any joint city-county board of health, any licensed graduate veterinarian whose primary use of biologicals is in his practice, or any retail establishment which purchases prepackaged biologicals not under its private label from a producer, manufacturer, distributor, or sales outlet registered under this chapter for sale to the general public only. Retail establishments which sell biologicals received from producers, manufacturers, and distributors, none of which are registered under this chapter, must obtain a separate permit for the biologicals obtained from each nonregistered source.

Permits issued under this Code section shall be posted in a conspicuous place in the business.

Any violation of this Code section shall constitute a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 177, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1966, p. 334, §§ 4-6.

4-9-4.
Permits — Transferability; effect of death of permittee.

Permits issued under this chapter shall not be transferable. Upon the death of a person to whom such a permit has been issued, the permit issued to such deceased person shall continue in full force and effect for a period of 90 days from the date of the death of such person, provided the Commissioner is notified of such death within 30 days from the date thereof. During the 90 day period, renewal shall not be required and the permit shall in all respects be subject to this chapter. The permit shall terminate upon the expiration of the 90 day period.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 177, § 11; Ga. L. 1966, p. 334, § 10.

4-9-5.
Promulgation of rules and regulations; revocation or suspension of permits, licenses, and certificates.

The Commissioner shall promulgate such rules and regulations as he deems necessary to carry out the provisions and intention of this chapter.

The Commissioner is authorized to revoke or suspend any permit issued under this chapter at any time when examination or inspection shall disclose violation of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated by the Commissioner, provided that unless revocation or termination is made automatic by this chapter, no license, permit, certificate, or other similar right shall be revoked or suspended without opportunity for hearing in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 177, § 7; Ga. L. 1966, p. 334, § 7.

4-9-6.
Employment of field agents, clerical help, and other personnel.

The Commissioner shall have the power and authority to employ field agents, clerical help, and other qualified personnel as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of and enforce this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 177, § 8; Ga. L. 1966, p. 334, § 8.

4-9-7.
Prohibited acts.

The following acts and the procurement, causing, aiding, or abetting of such acts within this state are prohibited:

The manufacture, sale, delivery, holding or offering for sale, or storage of any biologicals that are adulterated, mislabeled, or contaminated;

The receipt in commerce of biologicals known to be adulterated, mislabeled, or contaminated and the delivery or proffered delivery thereof with like knowledge, whether for pay or otherwise;

The willful dissemination of false advertisements concerning any biologicals;

The refusal to permit entry or inspection of any premises wherein biologicals are sold, held for sale, or stored and the refusal to permit the taking of a sample of any such biologicals;

The giving of a guaranty or undertaking which is false except when such guaranty or undertaking is given by a person who relied on a guaranty or undertaking to the same effect signed by and containing the name and address of a manufacturer, producer, distributor, or sales outlet holding a permit from the department and from whom he received the biologicals in good faith;

The removal or disposal of detained or embargoed biologicals, except by the Commissioner or his duly authorized agents;

The adulteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, or removal of the whole or any part of the labeling of any biologicals or the doing of any other act with respect to biologicals, if such act is done while such biologicals are held for sale and results in such biologicals being misbranded; and

The use on the labels of any biologicals or in any advertisement of any biologicals of any representation or suggestion that such biologicals have been approved by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 177, § 12; Ga. L. 1966, p. 334, § 11.

4-9-8.
Seizure, destruction, and withholding from sale of adulterated, misbranded, or contaminated biologicals.

The Commissioner shall have the right to seize, destroy, or withhold from sale any adulterated, misbranded, or contaminated biologicals. The Commissioner shall also have the right to withhold from sale any biological which he deems to be hazardous when administered by any persons other than an accredited licensed veterinarian, persons licensed under Chapter 50 of Title 43, or persons approved by him.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 334, § 13; Ga. L. 1976, p. 334, § 1.

4-9-9.
Injunctions.

The Commissioner or any person, corporation, firm, or association, in addition to the remedies set forth in this chapter, may obtain from a court of competent jurisdiction an injunction to restrain continued violations of this chapter. The granting of an injunction is authorized, notwithstanding the fact that such violation also constitutes a misdemeanor and notwithstanding the availability of adequate remedies at law.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 177, § 10; Ga. L. 1966, p. 334, § 9.